Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4712
Department; courts; collaboration.

The department and the courts shall work collaboratively to remove or reduce barriers to a child’s participation in age or developmentally appropriate activities.

Laws 2016, LB746, § 12.